Connecticut, session 2026, SB00416.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
Section 1. Section 13b-23c of the general statutes is repealed and the
following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective October 1, 2026):
The Commissioner of Transportation shall establish a matching grant
program for the purpose of assisting municipalities to modernize
existing traffic signal equipment and operations to (1) make such
equipment and operations capable of utilizing transit signal priority and
responsive to congestion, and [to] (2) reduce idling. Applications shall
be submitted annually to the commissioner at such times and in such
manner as the commissioner prescribes. The commissioner shall
develop the eligibility criteria for participation in the program and
determine the amount a municipality shall be required to provide to
match any such grant. The commissioner shall give preference to
applications [submitted by two or more municipalities and establish
incentives for projects undertaken by two or more municipalities]
involving projects located in heavily congested areas.
Sec. 2. Subsection (g) of section 21 of public act 20-1, as amended by
section 344 of public act 22-118 and section 74 of public act 23-205, is
amended to read as follows (Effective July 1, 2026):
LCO 1 of 6

Substitute Bill No. 416
(g) For the Department of Transportation: For construction, repair or
maintenance of highways, roads, bridges, noise barriers or bus and rail
facilities and equipment, not exceeding $130,000,000, provided not more
than $75,000,000 shall be used for a matching grant program established
pursuant to section 13b-23c of the general statutes, as amended by this
act, to assist municipalities to modernize existing traffic signal
equipment and operations.
Sec. 3. Section 22a-201d of the general statutes is repealed and the
following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective July 1, 2026):
(a) As used in this section, (1) "zero-emission school bus" has the same
meaning as provided in 42 USC 16091(a)(8), as amended from time to
time, (2) "alternative fuel school bus" means a school bus that reduces
emissions and is operated entirely or in part using liquefied natural gas,
compressed natural gas, hydrogen, propane or biofuels, [and (3)
"environmental justice community" has the same meaning as provided
in subsection (a) of section 22a-20a] (3) "distressed municipality" means
a municipality that is a distressed municipality under the provisions of
subsection (b) of section 32-9p on July 1, 2026, (4) "carrier" has the same
meaning as provided in section 14-212, and (5) "biodiesel" has the same
meaning as provided in section 32-324.
(b) Except as provided in subsection (c) of this section, (1) on and after
[January] July 1, 2035, one hundred per cent of the school buses that
provide transportation for [all school districts] each school district in the
state shall be zero-emission school buses or alternative fuel school buses,
and (2) on and after [January] July 1, 2040, [one hundred] ninety per cent
of the school buses that provide transportation for [all school districts]
each school district in the state shall be zero-emission school buses.
(c) (1) On and after [January] July 1, 2030, [one hundred] ten per cent
of the school buses that provide transportation for [school districts
entirely within an environmental justice community as of July 1, 2022,
or in an area that encompasses at least one environmental justice
community as of July 1, 2022,] each school district in a distressed
LCO 2 of 6

Substitute Bill No. 416
municipality shall be zero-emission school buses.
(2) On and after July 1, 2035, fifty per cent of the school buses that
provide transportation for each school district in a distressed
municipality shall be zero-emission school buses.
(3) On and after July 1, 2040, ninety per cent of the school buses that
provide transportation for each school district in a distressed
municipality shall be zero-emission school buses.
(d) (1) Not later than July 1, 2029, each distressed municipality shall
submit a plan and schedule to the Commissioner of Energy and
Environmental Protection that outlines how such distressed
municipality will achieve compliance with the provisions of this section.
(2) Not later than July 1, 2035, each municipality that is not a
distressed municipality shall submit a plan and schedule to the
commissioner that outlines how such municipality will achieve
compliance with the provisions of this section.
(e) On and after July 1, 2027, and until the school buses in a
municipality are zero-emission school buses in accordance with the
provisions of subsection (b) of this section, a carrier shall fuel, or cause
to be fueled, any fully diesel-powered school bus with a biodiesel blend
containing not less than twenty per cent biodiesel to the extent that such
biodiesel blend is available, unless the use of such biodiesel blend would
void the manufacturer's warranty on such school bus.
[(d)] (f) The Commissioner of Energy and Environmental Protection,
in consultation with the Connecticut Green Bank, shall establish and
administer a grant program for the purpose of providing [matching] a
portion of the funds necessary for municipalities, school districts and
school bus operators [to submit federal grant applications in order] to
maximize federal, state or other sources of funding or financing for the
purchase or lease of zero-emission school buses and electric vehicle
charging or fueling infrastructure. Applications for such grants shall be
filed with the commissioner at such time and in such manner as the
LCO 3 of 6

Substitute Bill No. 416
commissioner prescribes. The commissioner shall give preference to
applications concerning the purchase or lease of a zero-emission school
bus that will be operated [primarily in an environmental justice
community. The commissioner shall determine the amount a
municipality, school district or school bus operator shall be required to
provide to match such grant] in a distressed municipality.
[(e)] (g) The Commissioner of Energy and Environmental Protection
shall, within available funds and appropriations, provide
administrative and technical assistance to municipalities, school
districts and school bus operators that are transitioning to the use of
zero-emission school buses, applying for federal grants for such buses
and installing electric vehicle charging and fueling infrastructure.
Sec. 4. (Effective July 1, 2026) (a) For the purposes described in
subsection (b) of this section, the State Bond Commission shall have the
power from time to time to authorize the issuance of bonds of the state
in one or more series and in principal amounts not exceeding in the
aggregate forty million dollars.
(b) The proceeds of the sale of such bonds, to the extent of the amount
100 stated in subsection (a) of this section, shall be used by the Department
101 of Energy and Environmental Protection for the purpose of
102 administering the grant program established pursuant to subsection (f)
103 of section 22a-201d of the general statutes, as amended by this act.
104 (c) All provisions of section 3-20 of the general statutes, or the exercise
105 of any right or power granted thereby, that are not inconsistent with the
106 provisions of this section are hereby adopted and shall apply to all
107 bonds authorized by the State Bond Commission pursuant to this
108 section. Temporary notes in anticipation of the money to be derived
109 from the sale of any such bonds so authorized may be issued in
110 accordance with section 3-20 of the general statutes and from time to
111 time renewed. Such bonds shall mature at such time or times not
112 exceeding twenty years from their respective dates as may be provided
113 in or pursuant to the resolution or resolutions of the State Bond
LCO 4 of 6

Substitute Bill No. 416
114 Commission authorizing such bonds. None of such bonds shall be
115 authorized except upon a finding by the State Bond Commission that
116 there has been filed with it a request for such authorization that is signed
117 by or on behalf of the Secretary of the Office of Policy and Management
118 and states such terms and conditions as said commission, in its
119 discretion, may require. Such bonds issued pursuant to this section shall
120 be general obligations of the state and the full faith and credit of the state
121 of Connecticut are pledged for the payment of the principal of and
122 interest on such bonds as the same become due, and accordingly and as
123 part of the contract of the state with the holders of such bonds,
124 appropriation of all amounts necessary for punctual payment of such
125 principal and interest is hereby made, and the State Treasurer shall pay
126 such principal and interest as the same become due.
127 Sec. 5. (Effective July 1, 2026) (a) The Commissioner of Economic and
128 Community Development, or the commissioner's designee, shall
129 convene a working group to study and make recommendations
130 regarding (1) potential state policies and incentives to encourage the
131 utilization of freight rail for the transportation of goods within the state,
132 including, but not limited to, construction materials, metals and
133 industrial materials, agricultural and food products and municipal solid
134 waste, as defined in section 22a-207 of the general statutes, (2)
135 opportunities to expand freight rail infrastructure within the state, and
136 (3) the environmental, economic and transportation impacts of
137 increasing freight rail utilization.
138 (b) The working group shall consist of the Commissioners of
139 Transportation and Energy and Environmental Protection, or their
140 designees, the executive director of the Connecticut Port Authority and
141 any other member invited to participate by the Commissioner of
142 Economic and Community Development, including, but not limited to,
143 representatives of organizations representing the interests of
144 manufacturers in the state, representatives of freight rail carriers,
145 collectors of solid waste and recyclable items and any other member as
146 deemed necessary by the Commissioner of Economic and Community
147 Development. The Commissioner of Economic and Community
LCO 5 of 6

Substitute Bill No. 416
148 Development shall serve as chairperson of the working group and shall
149 schedule the first meeting of the working group not later than
150 September 1, 2026.
151 (c) Not later than January 1, 2027, the Commissioner of Economic and
152 Community Development shall submit, in accordance with the
153 provisions of section 11-4a of the general statutes, the results of such
154 study and any recommendations to the joint standing committee of the
155 General Assembly having cognizance of matters relating to
156 transportation. The working group shall terminate on the date that the
157 Commissioner of Economic and Community Development submits
158 such report or January 1, 2027, whichever is later.
This act shall take effect as follows and shall amend the following
sections:
Section 1 October 1, 2026 13b-23c
Sec. 2 July 1, 2026 PA 20-1, Sec. 21(g)
Sec. 3 July 1, 2026 22a-201d
Sec. 4 July 1, 2026 New section
Sec. 5 July 1, 2026 New section
Statement of Legislative Commissioners:
In Section 1, Subdiv. designators (1) and (2) were added for clarity, in
Section 3(b) and (c), references to "all school districts" were changed to
"[all school districts] each school district" for clarity, in Section 3(a)(3),
"was" was changed to "is" for consistency with standard drafting
conventions, in Section 3(e), "subsection (c) of this section" was changed
to "subsection (b) of this section" for accuracy, and in Section 4(b),
"subsection (f) of" was inserted before "section 22a-201d" for clarity.
TRA Joint Favorable Subst.
LCO 6 of 6